Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4
TOLL TUNNELS

43-3-401. Legislative declaration.

To improve highway transportation between the east and west slopes of Colorado and to enhance the designation of a national interstate and defense highway connecting U.S. highway 87 in Colorado with U.S. Highway 91 in Utah, the construction and operation of motor vehicle tunnels are authorized as provided in this part 4.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 642, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-1.

43-3-402. Powers and duties of transportation commission.

The transportation commission is authorized to take all steps and adopt all proceedings and to make and enter into contracts or agreements with other states, the United States, or any of its agencies, instrumentalities, or departments, necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this part 4; but any contract relating to the financing, construction, or operation of a toll or free tunnel provided for under this part 4 shall be approved by the governor before the same becomes effective.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 642, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1118, § 176, effective July 1.

43-3-403. Authority to construct tunnels.

The transportation commission is authorized to have constructed any tunnels between the east and west slopes of the state of Colorado for highway purposes as follows:

In the event the state of Colorado receives a designation of an east-west national defense and interstate highway across the state of Colorado from the United States bureau of public roads, the transportation commission may have constructed along the route of such highway such tunnels as shall be determined jointly by the United States bureau of public roads and the transportation commission; but the cost of such tunnels shall be borne by the state of Colorado and the United States in such proportions as may be agreed upon between the transportation commission and the United States bureau of public roads.

Repealed.

The transportation commission may, with the approval of the governor, enter into a contract with a private individual, firm, or corporation for the construction, maintenance, and operation of one or more tunnels.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 643, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1118, § 177, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) repealed, p. 872, § 12, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2004, § 75, effective May 22.

43-3-404. Anticipation warrants. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 644, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-4.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1133, § 80, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1119, § 178, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2004, § 76, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 291, § 48, effective August 8.

43-3-405. Interest - terms - public sale. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 644, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-5.

L. 91:

(2) to (5) amended, p. 1119, § 179, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 292, § 49, effective August 8.

43-3-406. Warrants lawful investments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 646, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-6.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1133, § 78, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 50, effective August 8.

43-3-407. Cessation in office not to affect signature. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 646, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-7.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 51, effective August 8.

43-3-408. Sinking fund and transfer from state highway fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 647, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1121, § 180, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 52, effective August 8.

43-3-409. Redemption procedures. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 647, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1121, § 181, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 294, § 53, effective August 8.

43-3-410. Highway revenue law not amended or repealed - when - rank of lien. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 647, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1121, § 182, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 294, § 54, effective August 8.

43-3-411. Warrants - obligations limited to highway fund - not state indebtedness. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 648, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1122, § 183, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 294, § 55, effective August 8.

43-3-412. No derogation of powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 648, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-12.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1122, § 184, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 295, § 56, effective August 8.

43-3-413. Fees, fares, tolls - contracts - rules.

Upon the completion of the construction of such toll or free tunnel, the transportation commission has the power to establish and collect fees, fares, and tolls for the privilege of traveling through such tunnel and over the approaches thereto, and to credit all such fees, fares, and tolls and all income, however derived therefrom, to the payment of the maintenance and operation of said tunnel.

In the event the commission shall, by contract as provided in section 43-3-403 (1), authorize the construction, maintenance, and operation of such tunnel by a private person, firm, or corporation, such contractor shall be reimbursed for the cost of such construction, maintenance, and operation together with a reasonable profit thereon only from fees, fares, and tolls to be charged by such contractor for the privilege of traveling through such tunnel and over the approaches thereto. All such schedules or amendments to schedules containing fees, fares, and tolls to be charged by such contractor shall be approved by the commission before the same become effective. Said contract shall also provide for the duration thereof and for such limitations, obligations, and duties in connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of such tunnel as the commission may determine to be advisable.

The commission has the power to adopt such rules and regulations governing the use of said tunnel, whether or not such tunnel was constructed and operated by the commission or by a private person, firm, or corporation, as the commission may determine to be advisable, and the commission shall exercise such other powers and authority as may be necessary or convenient to the practical and full operation and use of such tunnel.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 648, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-13.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1122, § 185, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 295, § 57, effective August 8.

43-3-414. Vesting powers in transportation commission.

This part 4 shall, without reference to any other statute, be deemed full authority for the construction of a tunnel under contract with, pursuant to design ordered or prepared by, and under the sole direction of the transportation commission. All the powers necessary to be exercised by the transportation commission in order to carry out the provisions of this part 4 are conferred by this article.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 649, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-14.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1122, § 186, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 295, § 58, effective August 8.

43-3-415. Transfer of assets. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 649, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 120-15-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-15-15.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 295, § 59, effective August 8.

43-3-416. Notice of investment opportunity. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 444, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1286, § 77, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 295, § 60, effective August 8.